Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB222.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 381.800 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The governing documents of an association shall not prohibit the outdoor display of
political yard signs by an owner or resident on the owner's or resident's property.
Signs shall be displayed no earlier than thirty (30) days before any[ special,]
primary, special election, or regular election and no later than seven (7) days after
that primary or election unless a longer time period is provided by local ordinance.
The governing documents may include reasonable rules and regulations regarding
the placement, size, and manner of display of political yard signs.
(2) All planned communities in this Commonwealth shall be subject to the provisions
of subsection (1) of this section, and any provision of any existing governing
document of a planned community in contravention of subsection (1) is void.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/13/2025 12:12 PM Jacketed